nursery/apertium-epo-fra/apertium-epo-fra.fra.dix
<pardef n="bala/yer__vblex">
  <e r="LR"><p><l>iera</l>      <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ierai</l>     <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ieraient</l>  <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ierais</l>    <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ierais</l>    <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ierait</l>    <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ieras</l>     <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ierez</l>     <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ieriez</l>    <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ierions</l>   <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ierons</l>    <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ieront</l>    <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ye</l>        <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ye</l>        <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__encimp"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ye</l>        <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ye</l>        <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ye</l>        <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ye</l>        <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>yent</l>      <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>yent</l>      <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>yes</l>       <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>yes</l>       <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ie</l>        <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ie</l>        <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__encimp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ie</l>        <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ie</l>        <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ie</l>        <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ie</l>        <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ient</l>      <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ient</l>      <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ies</l>       <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ies</l>       <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ya</l>        <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yai</l>       <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yaient</l>    <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yais</l>      <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yais</l>      <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yait</l>      <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yant</l>      <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
<!-- <e>       <p><l>yant</l>      <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="ND"/></r></p></e> -->
  <e>       <p><l>yas</l>       <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yasse</l>     <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yassent</l>   <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yasses</l>    <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yassiez</l>   <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yassions</l>  <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yer</l>       <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yera</l>      <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yerai</l>     <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yeraient</l>  <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yerais</l>    <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yerais</l>    <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yerait</l>    <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yeras</l>     <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yerez</l>     <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yeriez</l>    <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yerions</l>   <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yerons</l>    <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yeront</l>    <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yez</l>       <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yez</l>       <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__encimp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yez</l>       <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yiez</l>      <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yiez</l>      <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yions</l>     <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yions</l>     <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yons</l>      <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yons</l>      <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__encimp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yons</l>      <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yâmes</l>     <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yât</l>       <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yâtes</l>     <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yèrent</l>    <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yé</l>        <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yée</l>       <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yées</l>      <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yés</l>       <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="apitoyer" a="revo"><i>apito</i><par n="bala/yer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="appuyer" a="eleka"><i>appu</i><par n="bala/yer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="balayer">         <i>bala</i><par n="bala/yer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bayer" a="revo">  <i>ba</i><par n="bala/yer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bégayer" a="revo"><i>béga</i><par n="bala/yer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="broyer" a="revo"> <i>bro</i><par n="bala/yer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="chatoyer" a="revo"><i>chato</i><par n="bala/yer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="choyer" a="revo"> <i>cho</i><par n="bala/yer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="convoyer" a="revo"><i>convo</i><par n="bala/yer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="délayer" a="revo"><i>déla</i><par n="bala/yer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="effrayer">        <i>effra</i><par n="bala/yer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="effrayer de">     <i>effra</i><par n="bala/yer__vblex"/><p><l><b/>de</l><r><g><b/>de</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="égayer">          <i>éga</i><par n="bala/yer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="embrayer" a="revo"><i>embra</i><par n="bala/yer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ennuyer" a="eleka"><i>ennu</i><par n="bala/yer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="essayer">         <i>essa</i><par n="bala/yer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="essuyer">         <i>essu</i><par n="bala/yer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="étayer">          <i>éta</i><par n="bala/yer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="festoyer" a="revo"><i>festo</i><par n="bala/yer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="flamboyer" a="revo"><i>flambo</i><par n="bala/yer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="foudroyer" a="revo"><i>foudro</i><par n="bala/yer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="fourvoyer" a="revo"><i>fourvo</i><par n="bala/yer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="frayer" a="revo"> <i>fra</i><par n="bala/yer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="frayer un chemin"><i>fra</i><par n="bala/yer__vblex"/><p><l><b/>un<b/>chemin</l><r><g><b/>un<b/>chemin</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="grasseyer" a="revo"><i>grasse</i><par n="bala/yer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="guerroyer">       <i>guerro</i><par n="bala/yer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="louvoyer" a="revo"><i>louvo</i><par n="bala/yer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="nettoyer">        <i>netto</i><par n="bala/yer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ondoyer" a="eleka"><i>ondo</i><par n="bala/yer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="payer">           <i>pa</i><par n="bala/yer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="payer de retour"> <i>pa</i><par n="bala/yer__vblex"/><p><l><b/>de<b/>retour</l><r><g><b/>de<b/>retour</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="payer des honoraires"><i>pa</i><par n="bala/yer__vblex"/><p><l><b/>des<b/>honoraires</l><r><g><b/>des<b/>honoraires</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="payer des impôts" a="eleka"><i>pa</i><par n="bala/yer__vblex"/><p><l><b/>des<b/>impôts</l><r><g><b/>des<b/>impôts</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="payer par avance"><i>pa</i><par n="bala/yer__vblex"/><p><l><b/>par<b/>avance</l><r><g><b/>par<b/>avance</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="ployer" a="revo"> <i>plo</i><par n="bala/yer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="prépayer" a="revo"><i>prépa</i><par n="bala/yer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="rayer de dessus l'état"><i>ra</i><par n="bala/yer__vblex"/><p><l><b/>de<b/>dessus<b/>l'état</l><r><g><b/>de<b/>dessus<b/>l'état</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="rayer des effectifs"><i>ra</i><par n="bala/yer__vblex"/><p><l><b/>des<b/>effectifs</l><r><g><b/>des<b/>effectifs</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="relayer">         <i>rela</i><par n="bala/yer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="rudoyer" a="revo"><i>rudo</i><par n="bala/yer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tournoyer" a="revo"><i>tourno</i><par n="bala/yer__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="égayer">   <p><l>Ega</l>       <r>Éga</r></p><par n="bala/yer__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="effrayer de"><i>effra</i><par n="bala/yer__vblex"/><p><l><b/>pas<b/>de</l><r><g><b/>de</g></r></p></e>
<e r="LR" lm="payer des impôts"><i>pa</i><par n="bala/yer__vblex"/><p><l><b/>pas<b/>des<b/>impôts</l><r><g><b/>des<b/>impôts</g></r></p></e>
<e r="LR" lm="payer des honoraires"><i>pa</i><par n="bala/yer__vblex"/><p><l><b/>pas<b/>des<b/>honoraires</l><r><g><b/>des<b/>honoraires</g></r></p></e>
<e r="LR" lm="rayer de dessus l'état"><i>ra</i><par n="bala/yer__vblex"/><p><l><b/>pas<b/>de<b/>dessus<b/>l'état</l><r><g><b/>de<b/>dessus<b/>l'état</g></r></p></e>
<e r="LR" lm="rayer des effectifs"><i>ra</i><par n="bala/yer__vblex"/><p><l><b/>pas<b/>des<b/>effectifs</l><r><g><b/>des<b/>effectifs</g></r></p></e>
<e r="LR" lm="effrayer d'"><i>effra</i><par n="bala/yer__vblex"/><p><l><b/>pas<b/>d'</l><r><g><b/>de</g></r></p></e>
